District of Columbia statutes.
22-406

Mayhem or maliciously disfiguring.

Every person convicted of mayhem or of maliciously disfiguring another shall be imprisoned for not more than 10 years. In addition to any other penalty provided under this section, a person may be fined an amount not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1322, ch. 854, § 807
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 303(g), 60 DCR 2064

History

Additional penalty for possession of firearm, see § 22-4502.

Cross References

This section is referenced in § 5-132.21, § 22-3152, and § 24-112.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 22-506.
1973 Ed., § 22-506.

Prior Codifications

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added the last sentence.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 303(g) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Emergency Legislation

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.

Editor's Notes